Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1148
Powers of district; construction of act.

Nothing in the Nebraska Chemigation Act shall be construed to limit the powers of a district provided in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 48.

Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, see section 46-701.